Utah statutes.
78A-8-106.   Appeals -- Who may take and jurisdiction.

(1)  Either party may appeal the judgment in a small claims action to the district court of the county by filing a notice of appeal in the original trial court within 30 days of entry of the judgment.  If the judgment in a small claims action is entered by a judge or judge pro tempore of the district court, the notice of appeal shall be filed with the district court.

(2)  The appeal is a trial de novo and shall be tried in accordance with the procedures of small claims actions.  A record of the trial shall be maintained.  The trial de novo may not be heard by a judge pro tempore appointed under Section 78A-8-108.  The decision of the trial de novo may not be appealed unless the court rules on the constitutionality of a statute or ordinance.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

